hyph-utf8/hyph-cu.tex
.ѻⷷ҇8
.ѻⷸ8
.ѻⷸ҇8
.ѻⷹ8
.ѻⷹ҇8
.ѻⷺ8
.ѻⷺ҇8
.ѻⷻ8
.ѻⷻ҇8
.ѻⷼ8
.ѻⷼ҇8
.ѻⷽ8
.ѻⷽ҇8
.ѻⷾ8
.ѻⷾ҇8
.ѻⷿ8
.ѻⷿ҇8
.ѻꙴ8
.ѻꙴ҇8
.ѻꙵ8
.ѻꙵ҇8
.ѻꙶ8
.ѻꙶ҇8
.ѻꙷ8
.ѻꙷ҇8
.ѻꙸ8
.ѻꙸ҇8
.ѻꙹ8
.ѻꙹ҇8
.ѻꙺ8
.ѻꙺ҇8
.ѻꙻ8
.ѻꙻ҇8
.ѻ꙼8
.ѻ꙼҇8
.ѻ꙽8
.ѻ꙽҇8
.ѽ8
.ѽ̀8
.ѽ́8
.ѽ̈8
.ѽ̑8
.ѽ҆8
.ѽ҆̀8
.ѽ҆́8
.ѽ҆̈8
.ѽ҆̑8
.ѽⷠ8
.ѽⷠ҇8
.ѽⷡ8
.ѽⷡ҇8
.ѽⷢ8
.ѽⷢ҇8
.ѽⷣ8
.ѽⷣ҇8
.ѽⷤ8
.ѽⷤ҇8
.ѽⷥ8
.ѽⷥ҇8
.ѽⷦ8
.ѽⷦ҇8
.ѽⷧ8
.ѽⷧ҇8
.ѽⷨ8
.ѽⷨ҇8
.ѽⷩ8
.ѽⷩ҇8
.ѽⷪ8
.ѽⷪ҇8
.ѽⷫ8
.ѽⷫ҇8
.ѽⷬ8
.ѽⷬ҇8
.ѽⷭ8
.ѽⷭ҇8
.ѽⷮ8
.ѽⷮ҇8
.ѽⷯ8
.ѽⷯ҇8
.ѽⷰ8
.ѽⷰ҇8
.ѽⷱ8
.ѽⷱ҇8
.ѽⷲ8
.ѽⷲ҇8
.ѽⷳ8
.ѽⷳ҇8
.ѽⷴ8
.ѽⷴ҇8
.ѽⷵ8
.ѽⷵ҇8
.ѽⷶ8
.ѽⷶ҇8
.ѽⷷ8
.ѽⷷ҇8
.ѽⷸ8
.ѽⷸ҇8
.ѽⷹ8
.ѽⷹ҇8
.ѽⷺ8
.ѽⷺ҇8
.ѽⷻ8
.ѽⷻ҇8
.ѽⷼ8
.ѽⷼ҇8
.ѽⷽ8
.ѽⷽ҇8
.ѽⷾ8
.ѽⷾ҇8
.ѽⷿ8
.ѽⷿ҇8
.ѽꙴ8
.ѽꙴ҇8
.ѽꙵ8
.ѽꙵ҇8
.ѽꙶ8
.ѽꙶ҇8
.ѽꙷ8
.ѽꙷ҇8
.ѽꙸ8
.ѽꙸ҇8
.ѽꙹ8
.ѽꙹ҇8
.ѽꙺ8
.ѽꙺ҇8
.ѽꙻ8
.ѽꙻ҇8
.ѽ꙼8
.ѽ꙼҇8
.ѽ꙽8
.ѽ꙽҇8
%.ѿ1
%.ѿ7всю́д
.ӓ8
.ӥ8
.ӧ8
.ӭ8
.ӱ8
.ӹ8
.ᲂ8
.ᲂ̀8
.ᲂ́8
.ᲂ̈8
.ᲂ̑8
.ᲂу҆7стрем
.ᲂ҆8
.ᲂ҆̀8
.ᲂ҆́8
.ᲂ҆̈8
.ᲂ҆̑8
.ᲂⷠ8
.ᲂⷠ҇8
.ᲂⷡ8
.ᲂⷡ҇8
.ᲂⷢ8
.ᲂⷢ҇8
.ᲂⷣ8
.ᲂⷣ҇8
.ᲂⷤ8
.ᲂⷤ҇8
.ᲂⷥ8
.ᲂⷥ҇8
.ᲂⷦ8
.ᲂⷦ҇8
.ᲂⷧ8
.ᲂⷧ҇8
.ᲂⷨ8
.ᲂⷨ҇8
.ᲂⷩ8
.ᲂⷩ҇8
.ᲂⷪ8
.ᲂⷪ҇8
.ᲂⷫ8
.ᲂⷫ҇8
.ᲂⷬ8
.ᲂⷬ҇8
.ᲂⷭ8
.ᲂⷭ҇8
.ᲂⷮ8
.ᲂⷮ҇8
.ᲂⷯ8
.ᲂⷯ҇8
.ᲂⷰ8
.ᲂⷰ҇8
.ᲂⷱ8
.ᲂⷱ҇8
.ᲂⷲ8
.ᲂⷲ҇8
.ᲂⷳ8
.ᲂⷳ҇8
.ᲂⷴ8
.ᲂⷴ҇8
.ᲂⷵ8
.ᲂⷵ҇8
.ᲂⷶ8
.ᲂⷶ҇8
.ᲂⷷ8
.ᲂⷷ҇8
.ᲂⷸ8
.ᲂⷸ҇8
.ᲂⷹ8
.ᲂⷹ҇8
.ᲂⷺ8
.ᲂⷺ҇8
.ᲂⷻ8
.ᲂⷻ҇8
.ᲂⷼ8
.ᲂⷼ҇8
.ᲂⷽ8
.ᲂⷽ҇8
.ᲂⷾ8
.ᲂⷾ҇8
.ᲂⷿ8
.ᲂⷿ҇8
.ᲂꙴ8
.ᲂꙴ҇8
.ᲂꙵ8
.ᲂꙵ҇8
.ᲂꙶ8
.ᲂꙶ҇8
.ᲂꙷ8
.ᲂꙷ҇8
.ᲂꙸ8
.ᲂꙸ҇8
.ᲂꙹ8
.ᲂꙹ҇8
.ᲂꙺ8
.ᲂꙺ҇8
.ᲂꙻ8
.ᲂꙻ҇8
.ᲂ꙼8
.ᲂ꙼҇8
.ᲂ꙽8
.ᲂ꙽҇8
.ꙋ8
.ꙋ̀8
.ꙋ́8
.ꙋ̈8
.ꙋ̑8
.ꙋ҆8
.ꙋ҆̀8
.ꙋ҆́8
.ꙋ҆̈8
.ꙋ҆̑8
.ꙋⷠ8
.ꙋⷠ҇8
.ꙋⷡ8
.ꙋⷡ҇8
.ꙋⷢ8
.ꙋⷢ҇8
.ꙋⷣ8
.ꙋⷣ҇8
.ꙋⷤ8
.ꙋⷤ҇8
.ꙋⷥ8
.ꙋⷥ҇8
.ꙋⷦ8
.ꙋⷦ҇8
.ꙋⷧ8
.ꙋⷧ҇8
.ꙋⷨ8
.ꙋⷨ҇8
.ꙋⷩ8
.ꙋⷩ҇8
.ꙋⷪ8
.ꙋⷪ҇8
.ꙋⷫ8
.ꙋⷫ҇8
.ꙋⷬ8
.ꙋⷬ҇8
.ꙋⷭ8
.ꙋⷭ҇8
.ꙋⷮ8
.ꙋⷮ҇8
.ꙋⷯ8
.ꙋⷯ҇8
.ꙋⷰ8
.ꙋⷰ҇8
.ꙋⷱ8
.ꙋⷱ҇8
.ꙋⷲ8
.ꙋⷲ҇8
.ꙋⷳ8
.ꙋⷳ҇8
.ꙋⷴ8
.ꙋⷴ҇8
.ꙋⷵ8
.ꙋⷵ҇8
.ꙋⷶ8
.ꙋⷶ҇8
.ꙋⷷ8
.ꙋⷷ҇8
.ꙋⷸ8
.ꙋⷸ҇8
.ꙋⷹ8
.ꙋⷹ҇8
.ꙋⷺ8
.ꙋⷺ҇8
.ꙋⷻ8
.ꙋⷻ҇8
.ꙋⷼ8
.ꙋⷼ҇8
.ꙋⷽ8
.ꙋⷽ҇8
.ꙋⷾ8
.ꙋⷾ҇8
.ꙋⷿ8
.ꙋⷿ҇8
.ꙋꙴ8
.ꙋꙴ҇8
.ꙋꙵ8
.ꙋꙵ҇8
.ꙋꙶ8
.ꙋꙶ҇8
.ꙋꙷ8
.ꙋꙷ҇8
.ꙋꙸ8
.ꙋꙸ҇8
.ꙋꙹ8
.ꙋꙹ҇8
.ꙋꙺ8
.ꙋꙺ҇8
.ꙋꙻ8
.ꙋꙻ҇8
.ꙋ꙼8
.ꙋ꙼҇8
.ꙋ꙽8
.ꙋ꙽҇8
.ꙍ8
.ꙍ̀8
.ꙍ́8
.ꙍ̈8
.ꙍ̑8
.ꙍ҆8
.ꙍ҆̀8
.ꙍ҆́8
.ꙍ҆̈8
.ꙍ҆̑8
.ꙍ҆̑̀8
.ꙍ҆̑́8
.ꙍ҆̑̈8
.ꙍ҆̑̑8
.ꙍ҆̑҆8
.ꙍ҆̑҆̀8
.ꙍ҆̑҆́8
.ꙍ҆̑҆̈8
.ꙍ҆̑҆̑8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷠ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷠ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷡ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷡ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷢ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷢ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷣ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷣ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷤ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷤ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷥ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷥ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷦ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷦ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷧ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷧ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷨ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷨ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷩ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷩ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷪ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷪ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷫ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷫ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷬ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷬ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷭ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷭ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷮ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷮ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷯ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷯ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷰ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷰ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷱ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷱ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷲ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷲ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷳ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷳ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷴ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷴ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷵ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷵ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷶ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷶ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷷ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷷ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷸ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷸ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷹ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷹ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷺ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷺ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷻ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷻ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷼ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷼ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷽ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷽ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷾ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷾ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷿ8
.ꙍ҆̑ⷿ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙴ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙴ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙵ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙵ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙶ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙶ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙷ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙷ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙸ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙸ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙹ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙹ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙺ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙺ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙻ8
.ꙍ҆̑ꙻ҇8
.ꙍ҆̑꙼8
.ꙍ҆̑꙼҇8
.ꙍ҆̑꙽8
.ꙍ҆̑꙽҇8
.ꙍⷠ8
.ꙍⷠ҇8
.ꙍⷡ8
.ꙍⷡ҇8
.ꙍⷢ8
.ꙍⷢ҇8
.ꙍⷣ8
.ꙍⷣ҇8
.ꙍⷤ8
.ꙍⷤ҇8
.ꙍⷥ8
.ꙍⷥ҇8
.ꙍⷦ8
.ꙍⷦ҇8
.ꙍⷧ8
.ꙍⷧ҇8
.ꙍⷨ8
.ꙍⷨ҇8
.ꙍⷩ8
.ꙍⷩ҇8
.ꙍⷪ8
.ꙍⷪ҇8
.ꙍⷫ8
.ꙍⷫ҇8
.ꙍⷬ8
.ꙍⷬ҇8
.ꙍⷭ8
.ꙍⷭ҇8
.ꙍⷮ8
.ꙍⷮ҇8
.ꙍⷯ8
.ꙍⷯ҇8
.ꙍⷰ8
.ꙍⷰ҇8
.ꙍⷱ8
.ꙍⷱ҇8
.ꙍⷲ8
.ꙍⷲ҇8
.ꙍⷳ8
.ꙍⷳ҇8
.ꙍⷴ8
.ꙍⷴ҇8
.ꙍⷵ8
.ꙍⷵ҇8
.ꙍⷶ8
.ꙍⷶ҇8
.ꙍⷷ8
.ꙍⷷ҇8
.ꙍⷸ8
.ꙍⷸ҇8
.ꙍⷹ8
.ꙍⷹ҇8
.ꙍⷺ8
.ꙍⷺ҇8
.ꙍⷻ8
.ꙍⷻ҇8
.ꙍⷼ8
.ꙍⷼ҇8
.ꙍⷽ8
.ꙍⷽ҇8
.ꙍⷾ8
.ꙍⷾ҇8
.ꙍⷿ8
.ꙍⷿ҇8
.ꙍꙴ8
.ꙍꙴ҇8
.ꙍꙵ8
.ꙍꙵ҇8
.ꙍꙶ8
.ꙍꙶ҇8
.ꙍꙷ8
.ꙍꙷ҇8
.ꙍꙸ8
.ꙍꙸ҇8
.ꙍꙹ8
.ꙍꙹ҇8
.ꙍꙺ8
.ꙍꙺ҇8
.ꙍꙻ8
.ꙍꙻ҇8
.ꙍ꙼8
.ꙍ꙼҇8
.ꙍ꙽8
.ꙍ꙽҇8
.ꙗ8
.ꙗ̀8
.ꙗ́8
.ꙗ̈8
.ꙗ̑8
.ꙗ҆8
.ꙗ҆̀8
.ꙗ҆́8
.ꙗ҆̈8
.ꙗ҆̑8
.ꙗⷠ8
.ꙗⷠ҇8
.ꙗⷡ8
.ꙗⷡ҇8
.ꙗⷢ8
.ꙗⷢ҇8
.ꙗⷣ8
.ꙗⷣ҇8
.ꙗⷤ8
.ꙗⷤ҇8
.ꙗⷥ8
.ꙗⷥ҇8
.ꙗⷦ8
.ꙗⷦ҇8
.ꙗⷧ8
.ꙗⷧ҇8
.ꙗⷨ8
.ꙗⷨ҇8
.ꙗⷩ8
.ꙗⷩ҇8
.ꙗⷪ8
.ꙗⷪ҇8
.ꙗⷫ8
.ꙗⷫ҇8
.ꙗⷬ8
.ꙗⷬ҇8
.ꙗⷭ8
.ꙗⷭ҇8
.ꙗⷮ8
.ꙗⷮ҇8
.ꙗⷯ8
.ꙗⷯ҇8
.ꙗⷰ8
.ꙗⷰ҇8
.ꙗⷱ8
.ꙗⷱ҇8
.ꙗⷲ8
.ꙗⷲ҇8
.ꙗⷳ8
.ꙗⷳ҇8
.ꙗⷴ8
.ꙗⷴ҇8
.ꙗⷵ8
.ꙗⷵ҇8
.ꙗⷶ8
.ꙗⷶ҇8
.ꙗⷷ8
.ꙗⷷ҇8
.ꙗⷸ8
.ꙗⷸ҇8
.ꙗⷹ8
.ꙗⷹ҇8
.ꙗⷺ8
.ꙗⷺ҇8
.ꙗⷻ8
.ꙗⷻ҇8
.ꙗⷼ8
.ꙗⷼ҇8
.ꙗⷽ8
.ꙗⷽ҇8
.ꙗⷾ8
.ꙗⷾ҇8
.ꙗⷿ8
.ꙗⷿ҇8
.ꙗꙴ8
.ꙗꙴ҇8
.ꙗꙵ8
.ꙗꙵ҇8
.ꙗꙶ8
.ꙗꙶ҇8
.ꙗꙷ8
.ꙗꙷ҇8
.ꙗꙸ8
.ꙗꙸ҇8
.ꙗꙹ8
.ꙗꙹ҇8
.ꙗꙺ8
.ꙗꙺ҇8
.ꙗꙻ8
.ꙗꙻ҇8
.ꙗ꙼8
.ꙗ꙼҇8
.ꙗ꙽8
.ꙗ꙽҇8
8̀
̀1б
̀1ж
̀1ми1
̀2х
8́
́1а
́ба1
́1бли
́б1лю1
́1блѧ1
́б1н
́бно1
́б2р
́1бра
́бро1
́1брѣ
́брѧ1
́1брꙋ1
́б1ц
́б1ч
́бща1
́бы1
́бѣ1
́бꙋ1
́1ва
́вае1
́ва1с
́в1в
́1в2д
́вдо1
́1ве
́вед1
́1ви
́влю1
́в1лє
́2в1н
́вне1
́внѧ1
́внꙋ1
́1во
́во1с
́в1с
́в1ца
́2в1ч
́вше1
́1вы
́1вє
́1вї
́1вѡ
́1вѣ
́1вѧ
́1вꙋ1
́1га
́2гг
́1ги
́гл2
́г1ло
́гни1
́г1нꙋ
́1го
́гра1
́1да
́1д2в
́1де
́ди1в
́2дм
́2д1н2
́дно1
́1до
́д2р
́1дра1
́1дре
́д1с
́1ды2
́1дї
́1дї
́дѡ1в
́1дѣ
́1дꙋ
́1е
́еж2
́ема1
́емо1
́емꙋ1
́е2с
́ете1
́ет1н
́е2х
́1же
́жнꙋ1
́1жє1
́1жꙋ
́зво1
́з1вѣ
́зд2
́1зда
́з1др
́1здѣ
́1зе
́зе1р
́1зи
́2зл
́з1на1
́зни1
́з1но1
́з1нꙋ
́з1ра
́1зри
́1зрѧ
́1зы
́1зѣ
́1зѧ
́з1ꙋм
́1и
́й1
́и1в
́ил2
́иче1
́иша1
́2й1
́1ка
́1ки
́1клї
́кни1
́1ко
́1кр
́кры1
́крꙋ1
́2кх
́1кї
́1кї
́1кѡ
́1кꙋ1
́1ла
́ла1с
́л2д
́1ле
́1ли
́ли1н
́1ло
́л2х
́1лы
́1лю
́1лє
́лє1м
́1лї
́1лї
́1лѡ
́1лѣ
́1лѧ
́1лꙋ
́1ма
́1ме
́1ми1
́м1ли
́м1лѧ
́2м1н
́мна1
́мно1
́мнꙋ1
́1мо
́2м1п
́2мт
́1мы
́1мє
́1мі
́1мї
́мѡ1щ
́1мѣ
́1мѧ
́1на
́1не
́1ни
́н1к
́нми1
́ннї1
́ннї1
́1но
́н1ц
́н1ч
́1ны
́1ню
́1нѣ
́1нѧ
́1нꙋ
́нꙋи1
́1о
́ово1
́о2м
́1па
́1пе
́1пи2
́п2л
́пла1
́1пле
́пло1
́1плю
́1плѧ1
́2п1н
́1по
́п1с
́п1ш
́1пѡ1
́1пѣ1
́1пꙋ
́1ра
́р1ве
́рда1
́рди1
́р1дї
́1ре
́ре1д
́1ри
́рма1
́рна1
́рне1
́1ро
́ро1в
́р1р
́рта1
́2р1ц
́рша1
́рше1
́1ры
́1рю
́1рє1
́1рї
́1рї
́1рѡ
́1рѣ2
́1рѧ
́1рѷ2
́1рѷ2
́1рꙋ
́рꙋю1
́1са
́сав1
́1се
́1си
́с2к
́с2л
́сли1
́слѣ1
́смо1
́с1на1
́сни1
́с1но
́с1нꙋ
́1со
́1спе
́1спо1
́с1пѧ
́с1са
́с2т
́1ств
́1сте
́1сто
́стꙋ1
́1с2х
́с1цы
́с1ш
́сше1
́1сы
́1сѣ
́1та
́таи1
́тво1
́1твє
́1твѣ
́1те
́1ти
́ти1м
́2т1к
́2т1л
́тла1
́тли1
́т1н
́тна1
́тне1
́тнꙋ1
́1то
́то1р
́1тре
́1три1
́1тро
́1тры
́1трѣ
́1трꙋ
́2т1ц
́тцы1
́1тча
́1ты
́ть1
́1тє
́1тї
́1тї
́1тѡ
́1тѣ2
́1тѧ
́тѧ1н
́1тꙋ1
́1ха
́1хи2
́1х2м
́1хо
́хї2
́хї2
́хꙋ1
́1ца
́1це1
́1цы1
́1цѣ2
́1цꙋ
́чат1
́че1в
́че1с
́чи1с
́ч1н
́2ч1т
́чє1
́чї1
́чї1
́1чꙋ1
́шне1
́шꙋ1
́1ща1
́щна1
́щно1
́1щє1
́щѧ1
́1ю
́1є
́1ї
́їа1
́їи1
́ї2к
́ї1л2
́1ї
́їа1
́їи1
́ї2к
́ї1л2
́1ѡ
́1ѣ
́1ѧ
́ѧв1
́ѧ1т
́ѧти1
́ѳ2
́1ѳе1
́ѳо2
́ѵи1
́ѵ2к
́ѵ2с
́1ѻ
́1ꙋ
8̆
8̇
8̈
̈1е
8̏
8̑
̑1ва1
̑в1ни1
̑1внѣ
̑в1с
̑1вы
̑2гг
̑1ги
̑гꙋ2
̑гꙋб1
̑1да1
̑даю1
̑ди1
̑2д1н
̑дни1
̑дны1
̑днї1
̑днї1
̑1до1
̑1др
̑1ды
̑1дї1
̑1дї1
̑1дѣ2
̑дѣн1
̑1дꙋ1
̑2жд1
̑жны1
̑жї1
̑жї1
̑за2
̑зан1
̑з1на1
̑1зни
̑зны1
̑1зы
̑1и2
̑й1
̑йши1
̑ин1
̑2й1
̑йши1
̑1ка1
̑1ки
̑2кл
̑1кї1
̑1кї1
̑1ла
̑1ли
̑лла1
̑1ло1
̑1лы1
̑1лї1
̑1лї1
̑1ма1
̑м1н
̑мны1
̑1мы1
̑1ни1
̑1ны
̑нї1
̑нї1
̑1нѧ
̑1па2
̑1пи1
̑пкї1
̑пкї1
̑1п2л
̑2п1н
̑пни1
̑пны1
̑пї1
̑пї1
̑1ра
̑1ри
̑рна1
̑р1с
̑1ры
̑1са
̑с2л
̑1см
̑с1на1
̑1сни
̑с1с
̑с2т
̑1та1
̑1тв
̑1ти
̑т1н
̑тна1
̑тны1
̑1ты1
̑1тї1
̑1тї1
̑2х
̑1ц
̑че1
̑чи1
̑ч1н
̑чна1
̑чї1
̑чї1
̑1щ
̑ща1
̑1ю1
̑1ѧ2
̑ѧн1
̑ѵ1
8̾
̾1е
̾1и
̾и́1
̾и1м
̾1н
̾не1
̾2с2
̾1ѡ1
̾1ѧ
̾1ѻ1
̾1ꙋ
̾ꙋ́2
̾ꙋ́м1
̾ꙋ1в
̾ꙋго1
̾ꙋмѣ1
8а.
а2̀
8а̀8.
8а́8.
а́ва1
а́в1ц
а́г2
а́1гл
а́да1
2а́е
2а́ж
2а́з
а́з1в
а́1зр
а́з1ꙋ
а́к2
а́ка1
а́1кл
а́ла1
а́л1м
а́лꙋ1
а́м1в
а́м1л
1а́мь
а́мє1
а́мꙋ1
а́н1м
а́н1т
1а́ню
а́нѧ1
2а́1п
а́по1
а́р1в
а́р1г
а́с1н
а́с1п
2а́т
а́ти1
2а́х
а́1ц
а́чи1
2а́ш
а́ша1
а́щꙋ1
2а́ю
2а́ї
2а́ї
а́7ѣ
2а́ѧ
2а́2ѯ
а́1ѳ
2а́ѵ
а́ѵ1р
а2̑
8а̑8.
а̑2б
а̑в1н
а̑ж2
1а̑2м1
1а̑нѧ
а̑1п2
а̑2р1
а̑с1н
2а̑х1
а̑2ч1
а1а
аа́1н
аа̑2
а1б2
або1л
абы̑1
абѣ2
абꙋ́1
2ав
а1ва
ав1в
а2в1д
а1ве
а1ви
ав1лє
а2в1н
а1во1
аво́1
аврї1
аврї1
авше1
а1вы
авї1
а1вї1
а1вѡ
а1вѣ
а1вѵ
авѵ́1
авѷ1
авѷ1
а1вꙋ
авꙋ́1
а1г
а2г1г
агда1
1аге
2аго
аго́1
аго1р
агра1
агрѧ1
а1да
ада̑1
2а1де
2адѝ
ади1в
а2д1н
адно1
а1до
адо1с
а1ды
2адѐ
а1ді
адї1
а1дї1
2адѝ
2а1дѣ
2адѧ
а1дꙋ2
2а1е
ае́1ш
ае1д
аеди1
ае2к1
ае1с
аесѣ1
2а1ж2
аза2
азах1
аз1в
2азд
азди1
аз1др
аз1ды
аз1дѣ
а1зе
а1зи
2аз1л
а1зна
азо1р
2а2з1р
а1зы
азѡ1
а1зѣ
2азꙋ
2а1и
аи́1т
ай1
айшї1
айшї1
аи̑2
аи̑н1
аи1л
аи1м
аимо1
2а2й1
айшї1
айшї1
а1к
ака́1
ака̑1
аке1
аки1
акл2
ако1в
ако1н
ако1р
акос1
1акі
акѡ1в
а1ла
ала1л
ала1м
ала1х
ал1д
а1ле
1ален1
а1ли
али̑1
али1н
1алле
аллї1
аллї1
ал1м
а1ло
а1лы
а1лю
алю́1
а1лі
алї1
а1лї1
а1лѝ
а1лѡ
а1лѣ
а1лѧ
а1лꙋ2
а1ма
ама1р
1ам1в
а1ме1
1амер
а1ми
а1мо
амо1в
амо1м
а2м1п
а2м1ч
2амъ
а1мы
а1мі
амї1
а1мї1
а1мѝ
а1мѣ
амꙋ́1
2а1на
анас1
ан1д
а1не2
2а1ни
1анні
аннї1
аннї1
а1но
ано́1
ано1в
ан1ц
2анъ
а1ны
а1ню2
а1нѐ
1а1ні
ані́1
2анї1
2анї1
а1нѝ
анѡ1н
а1нѣ
а1нѧ
а1нꙋ
анꙋ́1
1анꙋа
2а1п2
апе́1
апер1
апе1т
апи́1
апре1
апі́1
апї1
апї1
а1ра
ара1с
ар1в
ар1д
ардо1
2а1ре
аре1м
2а1ри
ар1к
аркї1
аркї1
ар1л
ар1м
а1ро
аро1в
ар1с
ар1т
артї1
артї1
а1ры
2арь
а1рю
а1рѐ
а1рє
арє1м
а1рі
арі́1
арї1
арїи1
а1рї1
арїи1
2а1рѝ
а1рѡ
1арѡ̑
а1рѣ
2а1рѧ
а1рѷ1
а1рѷ1
а1рꙋ2
а1са
а1се2
а1си
ас1ло
а2с1н
а1со
ас1па1
ас1пе
аспи1
ас1пѧ
ас1с
ассї1
ассї1
2аст
ас1тв
ас1тл
а1стр
а1стѝ
а1сы
а1сѐ
а1сє
асє́1
асі́1
а1сѝ
а1сѡ
а1сѣ
2асѧ1
2ат
а1та
ата́1
ата̑1
ата1в
ата1н
а1тв
а1те
ате́1
а1ти
ати1л
а1т2л
а1то
ато́1
ато1с
а1тр
атрї1
атрї1
а1т2ч
а1ты
аты̑1
а1ті
аті́1
атї1
а1тї1
а1тѝ
а1тѡ
а1тѣ
а1тѧ
а1тꙋ
атꙋ́1
2а1ф2
афа2
афї1
афї1
афѵ́1
2ах
а1ха
аха́1
аха1л
а1хи
а1хо
а1х2т
ахі́1
ахѡ́1
ахꙋ1
а1ц
ацѣ2
а1ч
ачер1
аче1с
ач1н
ачꙋ2
а1ш
ашє́1
ашꙋ2
ашꙋ́1
а1щ2
аща́1
ащꙋ2
2а1ю
ающї1
ающї1
а1і
аі́1
аї1
аїа1
а1ї1
аїа1
2а1ѡ
аѡ1н
2а1ѧ
аѧ́1т
аѧ́ю1
аѯа́1
а1ѳ2
аѳа2
аѳо1
аѳі́1
а1ѵ́1
аѵ1р
аѵ1с
8а҆̀8.
8а҆́8.
а҆́1б
а҆́л1
а҆́1м
а҆́н1
а҆́нгел7ми.
8а҆̈8.
8а҆̑8.
а҆а1
а҆дѡ1
а҆1з2
а҆к2
а҆кꙋ1
а҆ме1
а҆мо1
а҆ра1
а҆1ск
а҆1ст
а҆ѵ1
8аⷠ.
8аⷠ҇.
а2ⷡ
8аⷡ.
8аⷡ҇.
8аⷢ.
8аⷢ҇.
8аⷣ.
8аⷣ҇.
а2ⷤ
8аⷤ.
8аⷤ҇.
8аⷥ.
8аⷥ҇.
8аⷦ.
8аⷦ҇.
8аⷧ.
8аⷧ҇.
8аⷨ.
8аⷨ҇.
2аⷩ
8аⷩ.
8аⷩ҇.
8аⷪ.
8аⷪ҇.
8аⷫ.
8аⷫ҇.
8аⷬ.
8аⷬ҇.
а2ⷭ
8аⷭ.
8аⷭ҇.
8аⷮ.
8аⷮ҇.
8аⷯ.
8аⷯ҇.
8аⷰ.
8аⷰ҇.
а2ⷱ
8аⷱ.
8аⷱ҇.
8аⷲ.
8аⷲ҇.
8аⷳ.
8аⷳ҇.
8аⷴ.
8аⷴ҇.
8аⷵ.
8аⷵ҇.
8аⷶ.
8аⷶ҇.
8аⷷ.
8аⷷ҇.
8аⷸ.
8аⷸ҇.
8аⷹ.
8аⷹ҇.
8аⷺ.
8аⷺ҇.
8аⷻ.
8аⷻ҇.
8аⷼ.
8аⷼ҇.
8аⷽ.
8аⷽ҇.
8аⷾ.
8аⷾ҇.
8аⷿ.
8аⷿ҇.
а1ꙋ
аꙋ́1т
аꙋ́1ч
8аꙴ.
8аꙴ҇.
8аꙵ.
8аꙵ҇.
8аꙶ.
8аꙶ҇.
8аꙷ.
8аꙷ҇.
8аꙸ.
8аꙸ҇.
8аꙹ.
8аꙹ҇.
8аꙺ.
8аꙺ҇.
8аꙻ.
8аꙻ҇.
8а꙼.
8а꙼҇.
8а꙽.
8а꙽҇.
2б.
2б̾1
1ба
ба́1н
ба́1с
ба́1т
ба́1ч
ба́1ш
ба̑2
ба1в2
баг2
ба1н
2б1б
2бвѐ
бве́1
2б1ви
бви́1
2бвѐ
2б1вѝ
1бг
2б1де
б2ди
бди́1
1б2дѣ
1б2е
бе2з1
бе1р2
бе1с
бет1
бе2х
1бж
1б2з2
бза2
бза́1
бзꙋ́1
1б2и
би́1д
би́1н
би́1с
би́1ц
би̑1
била1
би2м
бин2
би1р
би1с2
бити1
биша1
бл2
1бла
б1ла̀
бла́з7нен
бла1д
1бле1в
1блег1
б1лек
бле1м
б1лен
1бле1с
б1ле1ц
б1леч
1б2лѝ
1бли́
1ближ
1блим
1блис
2б1ло1
2блъ
2бль
б1лю̀
1блю́
1блю1д
б1лющ
2б1лє
блєн1
1б2лї1
1б2лї1
1б2лѝ
1блѧ.
1блѧ̀
б1лѧ́1
1блѧ̑
1блѧг
1бл҃
1блꙋ
2б1м
2бн2
бна1
бне2
б1нем
б1нет
б1ни
б1нов
бно1м
б1ны.
бнї1
бнї1
б1нѣ.
б1нѣм
б1нꙋ
1б2о
бо́1з
бо́1к
бо́1ц
бое2
бож2
бо1з2
болѣ́7зне
болѣ́7зни
бо1н
бо1р
бор1ц
бос2
бо1щ
бою́1
боѧ́7зни
бр2
1бра.
1бра̀
1бра̑
1браг
1браж
1браз
1бран
б1рат
1браѧ
1б2ре
бре1м
бре1т
1б2ри
1б2ро
бро1н
2бръ
1б2ры
2брь
1брє1
1брї1
1брї1
1б2рѡ2
1брѣ.
1брѣй
1брѣй
1брѣс
1брѣт
1б2рѧ
брѧ́1
1брꙋ̀
б1рꙋ́
б1рꙋг
1брꙋю
2б1с2
бско1
бсто1
2б1х
бхо́1
2бц
б1ца
б1цы
б1цꙋ
2бч
2б1ш
бша1
бшꙋ1
б2щ
1бща
бща́1
1бще
бще́1
1бщи
2бщн
1бщї2
1бщї2
2б2ъ
1бы
бы́7вы
бы́1д
бы́1ш
бы̑1н
бы1м
2бь1
1бѐ
1бє
бє́2
бє́с1
1бі
бі́2
бї1
1бї1
1бѝ
1бѡ
бѡ́1г
бѡ́р1
бѡ̑1
бѡ1л
1бѣ
бѣ́1ж
бѣ́1л
бѣ́1м
бѣ́1ш
бѣ1д
бѣдо1
бѣ1л
бѣ1с
бѣ1т
бѣто1
1б2ѧ
бѧ́1х
бѧ2т
бѧще1
б҃2
1бꙋ
бꙋ́1д
бꙋ̑1
бꙋ2з1
бꙋ1р
в̾2
в2а
1ва́1г
ва́1д
1ва́е
ва́1ж
1ва́й
1ва́й
1ва́м
ва́1т
ва́1ш
1ва́ю
1ва́є1
1ва́ѧ
1ва̑1н
1ва̑р
ва̑1ш
1ва̑ю
1вав
1вагѡ
ва1д
1вае
1вай
1вай
1вак2
вал2
1валъ
1вани
1ванн
1ванї
1ванї
1варѝ
1варс
1варъ
1вары
1варѝ
1варѡ
1варѧ
1вас
ва1ст
1ва1т
вати1
вах2
1вахо
1вахꙋ
1ваш
ваша1
ваше1
1ваю
вают1
1ваѡ
1ваѧ
2ваⷤ
2вв
в1ва
вва́1
в2ве
вве1д
ввер1
вве1с
в1во.
вво́1
в1вы
в1вꙋ
2в1г
вго1
1вда.
в1да́
в1да̑1
2вди
1в2до
1в2ды
1в2ді
в2дѡ
1в2дѣ
1в2дꙋ
в2е
1вѐ
1ве́а
1ве́д
1ве́и
1ве́к
1ве́м
1ве́с
1ве́т
ве́7тсѣмъ.
ве́тхо7мꙋ
1ве́ц
ве́1ч
1ве́1ш
ве1в
1ведд
1веди
1вед1н
1ведо
1ведꙋ
ве2з1
1ве1л
веле1
1вена
1вене
1вени
1вен1т
1венц
венї1
венї1
1вера
вер1д
1верз
1вери
веро1
1верш
1веръ
1верꙋ
1вес
ве1ст
1ве1т
1вецъ
1ве1ч
1вещ
в2ж
вжи1
1в2з2
вза1
взи1
взы́1
в2и
вѝ1
1ви́д
1ви́м
1ви́н
1ви́р
1ви́ц
1ви́1ч
1ви́ш
1ви̑
ви̑н1
1вив
2виг
2виж
2ви1з2
1вил
вила1
1вим
вима1
вимо1
1ви1н
ви1р
1вирї
1вирї
1вис
вис7сарїѡ́н
вис7сарїѡ́н
1вит
вити1
ви1ф
1вих
вице1
1вича
1вичю
1вичѣ
1вичꙋ
1виш
виша1
1вищ
в2к
вл2
1в2ла
вла1д
вла1с
1влек
1вле1ц
1влеч
1влещ
2в1ли
в2ло1
2влъ
2вль
в1лю̀
в1лю́1
в1лєн1
1в2лі
1в2лѣ
влѣ́1
в1лѧ.
влѧ́1
1в2м
вма́1
вмѣ1
вмѣ́1
в1на1
1вна̀
вне́1
1внег
в1нее
вне1м
в1ни.
в1ник
в1них
в1ниц
вно1
в1нод
в1ном
2внш
2внъ
2в1ны
2в1ню1
2внї
2внї
1внѡ́
1внѣ̀
2внѧ
в1нѧг
1внꙋ̀
в1нꙋю
во́з1
1во́л
1во́н
1во́т
1во́ю
1воа
во1в
1вовѣ
1вог
1вода
1води
вод1н
во8дна́
во8дно́
во8дны́
1воды
1водѝ
1водѣ
1вое.
2воѐ
вое1м
вож2
1вожꙋ
воз1
1возб
1возв
1возг
воз8да́н
1возм
1возн
возо1
1возс
1возш
1вой
1вок
1вол
1вомꙋ
1вон
вона1
1воп2
во1р
1воро
вор1ц
1вос
воси1
восо1
1вот2
воца1
1воч
воче1
во2ш1
2воѐ
2воє
2воѝ
1воѡ
2воѧ
в2п2
впа1д
впе1
1в2р2
вра̑1
вра1з
вре1д
вре1м
вро2
вро́1
врꙋ1
2вс2
в2са
в2се
все1н
все1р
все1х
все1ц
всеѡ1
в2си
